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DTC C1231 / 31, C1335 /35 SteeringAngleSensorCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1231 / 31

Detectionofanyofconditions 1. through3.:
1.When thecondition thatECUterminal IG 1 voltage is9.5

V or more, and does not receive a data from steering
anglesensorcontinues for 1 sec.ormore.

2.When thesteeringanglesensorvaluechangesby360 ˚
ormorewithSSCsignal fromsteeringanglesensor
remaining ON or OFF.

3. When the condition that difference between the steering
angle value at edge occurring in SSC signal and the
value at edge occurring in SSC signal after turning the
steeringwheelone −turn isoutof the range from355.5 ˚
− 364.5˚ occurs 10 timesormore.

SSteeringanglesensor
SSteeringanglesensorcircuit

C1335 /35
When theECUIG 1 terminal voltage is9.5Vormore,data
transmission fromthesteeringanglesensor is impossible
for 1 sec.ormore.

SSteeringanglesensor
SSteeringanglesensorcircuit
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Start the inspection fromstep 1 incaseofusing thehand −held testerandstart fromstep2 incaseofnot
using thehand −held tester.

1 Checkoutputvalueof thesteeringanglesensor.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check that the steering wheel turning angle value of the steering angle position sensor displayed on the
hand−held tester ischangingwhen turning thesteeringwheel.
HINT:
Aftercertifying ”Zero”pointof thesteeringanglesensor (Speed:35km/h,drivingstraightahead for 10sec.
or more), the value will change.
OK:

Steering wheel turning angle value must be changing.

OK Go to step 5.

NG

2 Check input voltage of the steering angle sensor.

PREPARATION:
Remove the column lower cover.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b)Measurevoltagebetween terminal 1 and2,2and9of the

combination switch wire harness side connector.
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 14 V

NG Check and replace harness and connector.

OK
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3 Check steering angle sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the steering wheel lower No. 2 and No. 3 covers,

steering wheel pad, steering wheel column upper and
lowercovers (SeePub.No.RM6 16EonpageSR −13 o r
SR−29).

(b) Disconnect the combination switch connector (for steer-
ing angle sensor).

(c) Connect the oscilloscope to the terminals 3 and 6 of the
combinationswitchconnector (forsteeringanglesensor).

(d)Applybatteryvoltagebetween terminals 1 and2.
CHECK:
Turns the steering wheel slowly and check the signal waveform.
OK:

HINT:
The above signal waveform does not repeat ON and OFF regu-
larly and this combination changes case by case according to
the data.

NG Replace steering angle sensor.

OK

4 Check that slits of the steering sensor disc are clogged up.

NG Repair or replace steering sensor disc.

OK
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5 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between steering
position sensor and skid control ECU (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace skid control ECU.


